Wisconsin, session 2025, AB601.
do enact as follows:AB601,13Section 1. 945.01 (1) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB601,2,44945.01 (1) (h) An event or sports wager made by a person physically located in 5this state using a mobile or other electronic device if the server or other device used 1to conduct such event or sports wager is physically located on a federally recognized 2American Indian tribe’s Indian lands and if the event or sports wager is conducted 3pursuant to an Indian gaming compact under s. 14.035 originally entered into prior 4to April 1, 1993.AB601,2,55